Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1313
State highways; abandonment; relinquishment; hearing.

The department shall have the authority, with the advice of the State Highway Commission and the consent of the Governor, to relinquish or abandon fragments of routes, sections of routes, or routes on the state highway system; Provided, that abandonment or relinquishment is accomplished in accordance with and subject to the provisions of sections 39-1314 and 39-1315. Prior to offering its advice to the Governor, the State Highway Commission shall extend an opportunity for a public hearing to the political or governmental subdivisions or public corporations wherein any portion of the state highway system is to be abandoned or relinquished.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 13, p. 423.